Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 4 Justices of the Peace and Constables

Cross references. —

As to justice of peace courts being supplanted by circuit courts, see §

5-9-104

.

As to civil jurisdiction of justices of the peace, see §§

1-21-101

through

1-21-1016

.

As to removal of justices of the peace from office, see §

18-3-907

.

As to election of justices of the peace at the general election, and as to term of office, see §

22-2-105

.

As to filling of vacancy in office of justice of the peace by county commissioners, see §

22-18-111

.

For duty of justices of the peace relative to the enforcement of §§

35-10-201

through

35-10-207

, relating to fireworks, see §

35-10-206

.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 6, effective July 1, 2000, provides: “A county having a justice of the peace court on August 1, 1999 which continuously maintained the court on and after that date until the effective date of this act [July 1, 2000], shall continue to have that court on and after the effective date of this act. The county shall continue to pay all costs, expenses and salaries for the court as it did on August 1, 1999. Except as provided in W.S.

5-9-119

, a county which continues to have a justice of the peace court on and after the effective date of this act shall not receive the services of the circuit court established under W.S.

5-9-102

. On and after the effective date of this act, the board of county commissioners of the county by resolution may abolish the justice of the peace court in that county effective at the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace. Upon the conclusion of the term of office of the then presiding justice of the peace, the county immediately and for all lawful purposes shall receive the services of the circuit court for the circuit within which the county lies.”

Laws 2000, ch. 24, § 8, provides: “The repeal of any statutes by this act shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty or forfeiture incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing before July 1, 2000, or any prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, every pending prosecution, suit, or action shall be proceeded in, tried, and determined in the circuit court which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the county court or which succeeds to the jurisdiction of the justice of the peace court.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

47 Am. Jur. 2d Justices of the Peace § 1 et seq.

Plea of guilty in justice of the peace court as precluding appeal, 42 ALR2d 995.

Failure to sign or verify complaint in justice of the peace court, 42 ALR2d 995.

Time for asserting disqualification of justice of the peace; waiver of disqualification, 73 ALR2d 1238.

Validity and construction of constitutional or statutory provision making legal knowledge or experience a condition of eligibility for judicial office, 71 ALR3d 498.

Disqualification of justice of the peace for pecuniary interest in fines, forfeitures or fees payable by litigants, 72 ALR3d 375.

Malicious prosecution: defense of acting on advice of justice of the peace, magistrate or lay person, 48 ALR4th 250.

51 C.J.S. Justices of the Peace §§ 4 to 6; 80 C.J.S. Sheriffs and Constables §§ 21, 22.